New Jersey, session 222, S2662.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this section: "Certified nurse midwife" means a midwife licensed by the State Board of Medical Examiners as a certified nurse midwife pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1991, c.97 (C.45:10-17 et al.). "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this State. b.    A certified nurse midwife or physician who practices obstetrics 1and provides prenatal maternity care to a pregnant patient1 shall provide 1[a] each1 pregnant patient 1in the midwifes or physicians care1, in writing in English and in at least the seven most common non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited-English proficiency in this State based on the United States Census Bureau American Community Survey data, during the initial consultation, and prior to the onset of labor 1[as determined by the Department of Health in consultation with midwives and physicians]1 , with evidence-based information on all birthing options that are available to the patient 1[, including] .  The information provided shall include1 , but not 1be1 limited to, 1information on1 planned hospital 1[birth induced with Pitocin or an] induced births,1 epidural 1births1, hospital water births, home water births, hospital non-Medicaid births, home non-Medicaid births, scheduled births and scheduled C-sections, emergency C-sections, health risks associated with each birthing option, health risks to the mother and infant associated with an epidural, Pitocin, and other medications, and a list of birthing options that 1[are] may be1 covered by 1[the] a1 patients health insurance carrier. c.     1[A certified nurse midwife or physician shall be required to provide on an annual basis, in a language that a pregnant patient understands,] The Commissioner of Health, in consultation with certified nurse midwives and physicians in the State, shall develop the1 evidence-based 1[education] information1 on all birthing options 1[available] to be provided1 to 1[the] a pregnant1 patient in accordance with subsection b. of this 1[act] section. The Commissioner of Health shall take reasonable steps to ensure that information is provided in a language that the pregnant patient can understand1. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.